District of Columbia statutes.
38-1946

Repealed

Leave with part pay authorized; limitations.

Repealed.

June 12, 1940, 54 Stat. 349, ch. 342, § 1
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 17, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1011.
1973 Ed., § 31-632.